Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of  this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 476.010 to
476.090.
SECTION 2. For the purpose of requesting a state  or nationwide criminal records check
under ORS 181A.195, the Department of the State  Fire Marshal may require the fingerprints
of a person who:
(1) Is employed or applying for employment by the department; or
(2) Provides or seeks to provide services to the department as a contractor, subcontrac-
tor, vendor or volunteer.
SECTION 3.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 15, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 28, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-INTRO) Page 2